North Dakota, session 69, HB1338.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new subsection to section 50-25.1-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
The department or authorized agent shall determine the military status of any individual
subject to an assessment, at the initiation of a child abuse or neglect assessment. If the
department determines an allegation of abuse or neglect involves a military-affiliated
individual, the department shall notify the nearest military installation's family advocacy
program of the allegation and investigation. The military installation is responsible for reporting
the data to the federal department of defense. The department may develop a memorandum
of understanding for use by the human service zone. For purposes of this subsection:
a. "Military-affiliated individual" means an individual with an active military status and the
individual's dependents.
b. "Military status" includes any branch of the United States military, and the national guard
or reserve.

H. B. NO. 1338 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1338.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State